Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-216
Victim of sex offense; law enforcement officer, prosecuting officer, or government official; prohibited acts.

(1) No law enforcement officer, prosecuting officer, or other government official shall ask or require an adult, youth, or child victim of a sex offense as defined under federal, tribal, state, territorial, or local law to submit to a polygraph examination or other truth-telling device as a condition for proceeding with the investigation of such offense.

(2) The refusal of a victim to submit to an examination as described in subsection (1) of this section shall not prevent the investigation of the offense.

Laws 2007, LB143, § 1.